en: soft wheat, tender wheat
es: trigo blando
fr: blé tendre
hr: meka pšenica
it: grano tenero

en: durum wheat, hard wheat
xx: durum
ar: قمح صلب
bg: твърда пшеница
ca: blat dur
cs: pšenice tvrdá
cy: gwenith barfog
da: durumhvede, hård hvede
de: Hartweizen, Durumweizen
el: σιτάρι Durum, σκληρός σίτος
eo: durum-tritiko
es: trigo duro, trigo candeal
et: durumnisu
eu: gari gogor
fa: گندم الجزایری
fi: durumvehnä
fr: blé dur
ga: dúram, cruithneacht chrua
gl: trigo duro
he: דורום
hr: tvrda pšenica
hu: durumbúza
it: grano duro
ja: デュラムコムギ
ka: მაგარი ხორბალი
ko: 듀럼밀
ky: катуу буудай
la: Triticum durum, Triticum turgidum subsp. durum
lt: kietasis kvietys
lv: cietais kviesis
mt: qamħ durum
nb: durumhvete
nl: durum tarwe, durumtarwe
nn: durumkveite
oc: blat dur
pl: pszenica twarda, pszenica durum, pszenicy durum, pszenicą durum, pszenicy twardej durum
pt: trigo-duro
ro: grâu dur
ru: пшеница твёрдая
sk: pšenica tvrdá
sl: trda pšenica
sv: durumvete
tr: durum buğdayı
vi: lúa mì cứng
zh: 硬粒小麦

fr: blé dur concassé
bg: вид едра твърда пшеница
es: trigo duro molido
nl: gebroken harde tarwe

en: finely ground durum wheat
de: Hartweizendunst
fr: fins finots de blé dur
hr: fino mljevena durum pšenica
it: friscello di grano duro

en: pre-cooked durum wheat, pre-cooked durum
fr: blé dur précuit
hr: prethodno kuhana durum pšenica
it: grano duro precotto, grano duro pre cotto

fr: blé dur précuit concassé, blé dur concassé précuit
nl: gemalen voorgekookte harde tarwe

en: whole grain durum wheat
bg: пълнозърнеста твърда пшеница
de: Hartweizenvollkorn, Hartweizen-Vollkorn
fi: täysjyvädurumvehnä
fr: blé dur complet
hr: durum pšenice
it: grano duro integrale
sv: fullkornsdurumvete, fullkorms durumvete

en: durum whole wheat flour
de: Hartweizenvollkornmehl, Hartweizenvollkorngrieß
fi: täysjyvädurumvehnäjauho
fr: farine complète de blé dur
hr: integralno brašno tvrde
hu: durumbúzaiszt, durum búzaliszt
it: farina di grano duro integrale, farina integrale di grano duro
nl: volkoren tarwegriesmeel
pl: pełnoziarnista mąka z pszenicy durum, pełnoziarnista mąka z pszenicy twardej, mąka pełnoziarnista z pszenicy twardej
ru: цельно зерновая мука из твердых сортов пшеницы
sv: fullkornsdurumvetemjöl, fullkornsmjöl av durumvete

en: durum wheat semolina, durum semolina
ar: سيولينا قمح صلب
bg: грис от твърда пшеница
bs: krupica durum pšenice
ca: sèmola de blat dur
cs: krupice z tvrdé pšenice, krupice z tvrdozrnné pšenice
da: durumhvede semulje, durumhvedesemulje
de: Hartweizengrieß, Hartweizengriess, Hartweizengries
el: σιμιγδάλισκληρού σιταριού
es: sémola de trigo duro, sémola de trigo candeal
et: durumnisujahu, durum nisujahu
fi: durumvehnäsuurimo
fr: semoule de blé dur, semoule de blé dure
ga: seimilín cruithneachta dúraim
hr: krupica durum pšenice, krupica od durum pšenice, krupica iz durum pšenice, durum pšenična krupica, pšenična krupica durum
hu: durumbúzadara, durum búzadara
it: semola di grano duro
lt: kietųjų kviečių manų kruopos, kietųjų kvietiniai manų kruopos, kietųjų kvietinės manų kruopos, kietųjų kvietinis manų kruopos
lv: cieto kviešu manna
mt: dqiq tal-qamħ durum
nb: durumhvete semule, durum semulegryn
nl: harde tarwe griesmeel, durum tarwegries, harde tarwegries, griesmeel van harde tarwe, durum tarwegriesmeel
oc: semola de blat dur
pl: kasza z pszenicy durum, semolina z pszenicy durum, semolina z pszenicy twardej durum, semolina z pszenicy twardej
pt: sêmola de trigo duro
ro: griș din grâu, griș de grău, gris de grâu dur
ru: борошно з пшеннци тверднх сортив
sk: krupica z tvrdej pšenice
sl: pšenični zdrob durum, pšenični durum zdrob
sr: krupica durum pšenice, durum pšenična krupica
sv: durumvetegryn
tr: durum buğdayı ırmığı
zh: 硬质粗粒小麦粉

en: superior quality durum wheat semolina
de: hochwertiger Hartweizengrieß
es: sémola de trigo duro de calidad superior
fr: semoule de blé dur de qualité supérieure, semoule supérieure de blé dur
hr: griz od durum pšenice vrhunske kvalitete
it: semola di grano duro di qualità superiore
nl: durumtarwegriesmeel van hoge kwaliteit
pt: sêmola de trigo rijo de qualidade superior

fr: semoule de blé dur blanche biologique
de: biologische weiße Hartweizengrieß
es: sémola de trigo duro blanca orgánica
it: semolina di grano duro bianca biologica

en: semi-whole durum wheat semolina, semi-complete durum wheat semolina
de: Halbvollkorn-Hartweizengrieß, Hartweizengrieß halbvollkorn
fr: semoule de blé dur semi-complète, semoule semi-complète de blé dur
hr: polucjelovita krupica od durum pšenice
it: semola di grano duro semi-integrale
nl: halfvolkoren harde tarwegriesmeel

en: whole durum wheat semolina, durum wholewheat semolina, Whole durum semolina
bs: integralna krupica durum pšenice
da: fuldkorns durumhvede, Fuldkornsdurumhvede
de: Vollkorn-Hartweizengriß, Vollkorn-Hartweizengrieß
el: σιμιγδάλι αλέσεως σκληρού σιταριού, σιμιγδάλι ολικής αλέσεως σκληρού σιταριού
es: sémola de trigo candeal integral
fi: durum-täysjyvävehnäjauho
fr: semoule de blé dur complète, semoule complète de blé dur, semoule de ble dur complet
hr: integralna krupica durum pšenice, integralne krupice durum pšenice, durum krupica iz pšenice cjelovitog zrna, krupica od durum pšenice od cjelovitog zrna
hu: teljes kiőrlésű durumbúzadara, teljes kiőrlésű durum búzaliszt
it: semola di grano duro integrale, semola integrale di grano duro
nl: volkoren griesmeel van harde tarwe
nn: fullkornsdurumhvete
pt: semola integral de trigo duro
ru: Органичесая цельнозерновая мука из твердых сортов пшеницы
sl: polnozrnati pšenični zdrob durum
sr: integralna krupica durum pšenice
sv: fullkornsdurumvetesemolina

en: organic whole durum wheat semolina
hr: eko integralna krupica durum pšenice
it: semola di grano duro integrale bio, semola integrale di grano duro bio

en: freekeh, frik, cooked spelt freekeh
xx: freekeh
ar: فريكة
ba: фәрикә
de: Freekeh, Farik
fr: frik, blé vert freekeh, blé concassé frik, blé concassé
he: פריקה
ja: フリーカ
ru: фрике
tr: firik
zh: 翡麦

en: rivet wheat, poulard wheat, cone wheat
fr: blé poulard
hr: pularna pšenica
hu: hasas vagy angol búza
it: grano Poulard
la: Triticum turgidum L. subsp. turgidum

en: durum wheat kernels, durum kernels
da: durumkerner
sv: durumkärnor

en: wheat germ, wheatgerm
bg: пшеничен зародиш
ca: germen de blat
de: Weizenkeime
es: germen de trigo
fi: vehnänalkio, vehnänalkiot
fr: germe de blé, germes de blé
hr: pšenična trava
hu: búzacsíra
it: germe di frumento, germi di frumento
nb: hvetekim
nl: tarwekiem
pl: kielki pszenicy
pt: gérmen de trigo
ro: germeni de grâu
sv: vetegroddar

en: graham flour, whole grain graham flour
bg: брашно грахам, пълнозърнесто брашно от грахам, брашно пълнозърнесто грахам
da: grahamsmel
de: Grahammehl, Graham-Mehl
es: harina de graham
fr: Farine Graham
hr: graham brašno
it: Farina di Graham
nb: grahamsmel
ro: făină graham
sv: grahamsmjöl, fullkornsgrahamsmjöl, grahamsmjöl av vete

en: seitan
an: Seitán
ca: seitan
cs: Seitan
da: Seitan
de: Seitan
eo: Sejtano
es: Seitán
eu: Seitan
fi: Seitan
fr: seitan
gl: Seitán
he: סייטן
hr: sejtan
hu: szejtán, búzahús, búzasikér
it: Seitan
ko: 밀고기
lt: Kvietinė mėsa
nl: Seitan
pl: seitan
pt: seitan
ru: Сейтан
sk: Seitan
sr: пшенични скроб
sv: Seitan
tr: Buğday gluteni
vi: Mì căn
zh: 面筋